Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 7

Project RAP

71-3-701. Project RAP — Creation — Services.

There is created within the department of children's services the responsible adolescent parenting project (also known as “Project RAP”).

The project shall include information, programs, counseling, and services:

For teens who are pregnant with, or who have recently had, their first child; and

For foster care teens.

Project RAP may also include information, programs, counseling and services for other teens at high risk of pregnancy. In administering the project, the department shall strive to improve the parenting skills of those Project RAP clients who are pregnant or who are recent first time parents. The department shall also strive to prevent unintended future pregnancies among the total Project RAP client population and to encourage all project participants to pursue and complete educational and vocational opportunities.

Acts 1989, ch. 293, § 1; 1996, ch. 1079, § 182.

Cross-References. Teenage pregnancy, title 37, ch. 3, part 5.

71-3-702. Current operation — Expansion.

During fiscal year 1989-1990, the department shall continue to operate Project RAP in Memphis as a model program, as it has since 1986. Beginning July 1, 1990, if and only if funds are specifically allocated in the general appropriations act for the purpose of expanding Project RAP, then the department shall geographically expand Project RAP into additional areas of the state in which there are significant concentrations of first time teen mothers, foster care teens, and other teens at high risk of pregnancy. In implementing such expansion, priority shall be given to establishing Project RAP in each of the state's three (3) grand divisions within those areas in which the project can exercise maximum impact both upon the state's pregnancy rate, among females seventeen (17) years of age and under, and upon taxpayer expenditures for temporary assistance for needy families (TANF), other types of public assistance, and medicaid.

Acts 1989, ch. 293, § 2.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.